Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201144-4219
Plan of operation;
contents.

In its plan of operation, the board shall:

(1) Establish procedures for the handling and accounting of
assets and funds of the pool;

(2) Select a
pool administrator in accordance with section 44-4223;

(3) Establish procedures for the selection, replacement, term
of office, and qualifications of the directors of the board and rules of procedures
for the operation of the board; and

(4) Develop and implement a program to publicize the existence
of the pool, the eligibility requirements, and the procedures for enrollment
and to maintain public awareness of the pool.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 19;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 33;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB73, § 2.
May 18, 2011